apertium-ces-ces.ces_han.dix
    <pardef n="obyvatelst/vo__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>vo</l>
        <r>vo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>va</l>
        <r>vo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>vu</l>
        <r>vo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>vo</l>
        <r>vo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>vem</l>
        <r>vo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>vu</l>
        <r>vo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>vo</l>
        <r>vo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>va</l>
        <r>vo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ev</l>
        <r>vo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>vům</l>
        <r>vo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>va</l>
        <r>vo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>vy</l>
        <r>vo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>vech</l>
        <r>vo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>va</l>
        <r>vo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="jm/éno__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>éno</l>
        <r>éno<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>éna</l>
        <r>éno<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>énu</l>
        <r>éno<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>éno</l>
        <r>éno<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>énem</l>
        <r>éno<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>éně</l>
        <r>éno<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>énu</l>
        <r>éno<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>éno</l>
        <r>éno<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>éna</l>
        <r>éno<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>en</l>
        <r>éno<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>énům</l>
        <r>éno<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>éna</l>
        <r>éno<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ény</l>
        <r>éno<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>énech</l>
        <r>éno<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>éna</l>
        <r>éno<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="windsurfin/g__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>g</l>
        <r>g<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>gu</l>
        <r>g<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>gu</l>
        <r>g<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>g</l>
        <r>g<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>gem</l>
        <r>g<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>gu</l>
        <r>g<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>gu</l>
        <r>g<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>gy</l>
        <r>g<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>gů</l>
        <r>g<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>gům</l>
        <r>g<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>gy</l>
        <r>g<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>gy</l>
        <r>g<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>zích</l>
        <r>g<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>gy</l>
        <r>g<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="no/ha__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ha</l>
        <r>ha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>hy</l>
        <r>ha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ze</l>
        <r>ha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>hu</l>
        <r>ha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>hou</l>
        <r>ha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ze</l>
        <r>ha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ho</l>
        <r>ha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>hy</l>
        <r>ha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>hou</l>
        <r>ha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>hám</l>
        <r>ha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>hy</l>
        <r>ha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>hami</l>
        <r>ha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>hou</l>
        <r>ha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>hy</l>
        <r>ha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <e lm="airbag"><i>airba</i><par n="windsurfin/g__n"/></e>
    <e lm="božstvo"><i>božst</i><par n="obyvatelst/vo__n"/></e>
    <e lm="curling"><i>curlin</i><par n="windsurfin/g__n"/></e>
    <e lm="leasing"><i>leasin</i><par n="windsurfin/g__n"/></e>
    <e r="LR" lm="dumping"><p><l>dampin</l><r>dumpin</r></p><par n="windsurfin/g__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dialog"><i>dialo</i><par n="windsurfin/g__n"/></e>
    <e lm="družstvo"><i>družst</i><par n="obyvatelst/vo__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dumping"><i>dumpin</i><par n="windsurfin/g__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dělostřelectvo"><i>dělostřelect</i><par n="obyvatelst/vo__n"/></e>
    <e lm="epilog"><i>epilo</i><par n="windsurfin/g__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gag"><i>ga</i><par n="windsurfin/g__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gang"><i>gan</i><par n="windsurfin/g__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gong"><i>gon</i><par n="windsurfin/g__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gulag"><i>gula</i><par n="windsurfin/g__n"/></e>
    <e lm="happening"><i>happenin</i><par n="windsurfin/g__n"/></e>
    <e lm="holding"><i>holdin</i><par n="windsurfin/g__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jméno"><i>jm</i><par n="jm/éno__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jogging"><i>joggin</i><par n="windsurfin/g__n"/></e>
    <e lm="letectvo"><i>letect</i><par n="obyvatelst/vo__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lidstvo"><i>lidst</i><par n="obyvatelst/vo__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ministerstvo"><i>ministerst</i><par n="obyvatelst/vo__n"/></e>
    <e lm="monolog"><i>monolo</i><par n="windsurfin/g__n"/></e>
    <e lm="noha"><i>no</i><par n="no/ha__n"/></e>
    <e lm="obecenstvo"><i>obecenst</i><par n="obyvatelst/vo__n"/></e>
    <e lm="obyvatelstvo"><i>obyvatelst</i><par n="obyvatelst/vo__n"/></e>
    <e lm="potomstvo"><i>potomst</i><par n="obyvatelst/vo__n"/></e>
    <e lm="prolog"><i>prolo</i><par n="windsurfin/g__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ptactvo"><i>ptact</i><par n="obyvatelst/vo__n"/></e>
    <e lm="příbuzenstvo"><i>příbuzenst</i><par n="obyvatelst/vo__n"/></e>
    <e lm="slang"><i>slan</i><par n="windsurfin/g__n"/></e>
    <e lm="společenstvo"><i>společenst</i><par n="obyvatelst/vo__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sponzoring"><i>sponzorin</i><par n="windsurfin/g__n"/></e>
    <e lm="svalstvo"><i>svalst</i><par n="obyvatelst/vo__n"/></e>
    <e lm="svinstvo"><i>svinst</i><par n="obyvatelst/vo__n"/></e>
    <e lm="windsurfing"><i>windsurfin</i><par n="windsurfin/g__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bratrstvo"><i>bratrst</i><par n="obyvatelst/vo__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bumerang"><i>bumeran</i><par n="windsurfin/g__n"/></e>
    <e lm="námořnictvo"><i>námořnict</i><par n="obyvatelst/vo__n"/></e>
